italian.lexc
!!!italian.lexc!!!

Multichar_Symbols +N +V +A +Sg +Pl +1 +2 +3 +F +M +Presente +Futuro +Semplice +Remoto +Passato +Part +Imperfetto +Condizionale +Congiuntivo +Participio +Gerundio

LEXICON Root

Noun ;
Verb ;
Adv  ;

LEXICON Ninf

+N+Sg:0	#;
+N+Pl:^i	#;
+N+Pl:^e	#;

LEXICON Vinf

+V:0	#;
+V+Presente+Sg+1:^o	#;
+V+Presente+Sg+2:^i	#;
+V+Presente+Sg+3:^e	#;
+V+Presente+Pl+1:^iamo	#;
+V+Presente+Pl+2:^te	#;
+V+Presente+Pl+3:^ono	#;
+V+Futuro+Semplice+Sg+1:^ò	#;
+V+Futuro+Semplice+Sg+2:^ai	#;
+V+Futuro+Semplice+Sg+3:^à	#;
+V+Futuro+Semplice+Pl+1:^emo	#;
+V+Futuro+Semplice+Pl+2:^ete	#;
+V+Futuro+Semplice+Pl+3:^anno	#;
+V+Passato+Remoto+Sg+1:$i	#;
+V+Passato+Remoto+Sg+2:^sti	#;
+V+Passato+Remoto+Sg+3:^'	#;
+V+Passato+Remoto+Pl+1:^mmo	#;
+V+Passato+Remoto+Pl+2:^ste	#;
+V+Passato+Remoto+Pl+3:^rono	#;
+V+Imperfetto+Sg+1:^vo	#;
+V+Imperfetto+Sg+2:^vi	#;
+V+Imperfetto+Sg+3:^va	#;
+V+Imperfetto+Pl+1:^vamo	#;
+V+Imperfetto+Pl+2:^vate	#;
+V+Imperfetto+Pl+3:^vano	#;
+V+Condizionale+Sg+1:^rei	#;
+V+Condizionale+Sg+2:^resti	#;
+V+Condizionale+Sg+3:^rebbe	#;
+V+Condizionale+Pl+1:^remmo	#;
+V+Condizionale+Pl+2:^reste	#;
+V+Condizionale+Pl+3:^rebbero	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Imperfetto+Sg+1:^ssl	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Imperfetto+Sg+2:^ssl	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Imperfetto+Sg+2:^sse	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Imperfetto+Sg+2:^ssimo	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Imperfetto+Sg+1:^ste	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Imperfetto+Sg+2:^ssero	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Presente+Sg:^a	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Presente+Pl+1:^iamo	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Presente+Pl+2:^iate	#;
+V+Congiuntivo+Presente+Pl+3:^ano	#;
+V+Condizionale+Passato+Sg:^to	#;
+V+Condizionale+Passato+Pl:^ti	#;
+V+Gerundio:^ndo	#;

LEXICON Ainf

+A+M+Sg:0	#;
+A+F+Sg:^a	#;
+A+M+Pl:^i	#;
+A+F+Pl:^e	#;
+A+Participio+Presente:^nte	#;
+A+Participio+Presente:^nti	#;

LEXICON Noun
sugo	Ninf;
riduzionismo	Ninf;
invocazione	Ninf;
ottuagenario	Ninf;
lirica	Ninf;
fortificazione	Ninf;
correttezza	Ninf;
location	Ninf;
dismisura	Ninf;
ventata	Ninf;
gol-fantasma	Ninf;
ermellino	Ninf;
orrendo	Ninf;
bolletta	Ninf;
squadra	Ninf;
ippopotamo	Ninf;
futuro	Ninf;
casolare	Ninf;
chiarore	Ninf;
ragazzaccio	Ninf;
rimosso	Ninf;
irradiazione	Ninf;
conservatorio	Ninf;
crocchio	Ninf;
teledipendente	Ninf;
largo	Ninf;
capopattuglia	Ninf;
turbante	Ninf;
faraone	Ninf;
conterraneo	Ninf;
birra	Ninf;
ambito	Ninf;
gonnella	Ninf;
annegato	Ninf;
governabilità	Ninf;
neo-nazista	Ninf;
aridità	Ninf;
snellezza	Ninf;
presidenzialista	Ninf;
piantina	Ninf;
sfasamento	Ninf;
protettorato	Ninf;
luglio	Ninf;
crocevia	Ninf;
procacciatore	Ninf;
satellite-spia	Ninf;
zanzara	Ninf;
vitalismo	Ninf;
artificiere	Ninf;
biologo	Ninf;
padreterno	Ninf;
creta	Ninf;
provvista	Ninf;
seduttrice	Ninf;
credente	Ninf;
grisaglia	Ninf;
vibrato	Ninf;
polimero	Ninf;
agape	Ninf;
rottura	Ninf;
anglofilo	Ninf;
mareggiata	Ninf;
nefandezza	Ninf;
decoder	Ninf;
dance	Ninf;
camerata	Ninf;
neo-eletto	Ninf;
bellezza	Ninf;
ormone	Ninf;
eclisse	Ninf;
tematica	Ninf;
becchino	Ninf;
exploit	Ninf;
porzione	Ninf;
intransigenza	Ninf;
mentitore	Ninf;
freddo	Ninf;
latifondo	Ninf;
mundial	Ninf;
drappo	Ninf;
personalizzazione	Ninf;
stoltezza	Ninf;
contorto	Ninf;
ultras	Ninf;
azzurrino	Ninf;
sovietica	Ninf;
monumentalità	Ninf;
distratta	Ninf;
mozione	Ninf;
maldicenza	Ninf;
studentessa	Ninf;
canale	Ninf;
tassista	Ninf;
traditore	Ninf;
ricercatezza	Ninf;
validità	Ninf;
escrescenza	Ninf;
installatore	Ninf;
pomeridiana	Ninf;
lampeggiante	Ninf;
litania	Ninf;
biancoceleste	Ninf;
succo	Ninf;
caricatore	Ninf;
fiammella	Ninf;
ciglio	Ninf;
perdita	Ninf;
britanno	Ninf;
neo-gollista	Ninf;
neo-mamma	Ninf;
pistone	Ninf;
sottosegretario	Ninf;
astante	Ninf;
pista	Ninf;
superpoliziotto	Ninf;
battente	Ninf;
gallerista	Ninf;
disgelo	Ninf;
dopo-voto	Ninf;
impronta	Ninf;
villaggio	Ninf;
imperatrice	Ninf;
politicità	Ninf;
mutualità	Ninf;
scuderia	Ninf;
puttanata	Ninf;
sprovveduto	Ninf;
incantatore	Ninf;
capitalina	Ninf;
mobilio	Ninf;
spazzatura	Ninf;
angiporto	Ninf;
canottiere	Ninf;
cedolino	Ninf;
campetto	Ninf;
servizietto	Ninf;
pensatoio	Ninf;
tessitura	Ninf;
roccia	Ninf;
seracco	Ninf;
seggio	Ninf;
carcerazione	Ninf;
nodo	Ninf;
chiacchera	Ninf;
avvertimento	Ninf;
enoteca	Ninf;
principessina	Ninf;
sedia	Ninf;
fognatura	Ninf;
alt	Ninf;
mondializzazione	Ninf;
confisca	Ninf;
sorgente	Ninf;
bronzo	Ninf;
avventore	Ninf;
nuoto	Ninf;
metrò	Ninf;
ruffiano	Ninf;
capitano	Ninf;
raffinato	Ninf;
ingerenza	Ninf;
fischietto	Ninf;
LEXICON Verb
telelavorare	Vinf;
sovrapporre	Vinf;
fertilizzare	Vinf;
prevaricare	Vinf;
digradare	Vinf;
ammontare	Vinf;
sbronzare	Vinf;
intabarrare	Vinf;
miagolare	Vinf;
scartabellare	Vinf;
fanatizzare	Vinf;
allertare	Vinf;
riconsiderare	Vinf;
vaffanculeggiare	Vinf;
imbevere	Vinf;
criocongelare	Vinf;
denotare	Vinf;
amicare	Vinf;
parcheggiare	Vinf;
disapprovare	Vinf;
diplomare	Vinf;
apostrofare	Vinf;
riordinare	Vinf;
rattrappire	Vinf;
veicolare	Vinf;
impaniare	Vinf;
disinfettare	Vinf;
gualcire	Vinf;
raddolcire	Vinf;
susseguire	Vinf;
scempiare	Vinf;
sbracare	Vinf;
vacare	Vinf;
corrodere	Vinf;
aprire	Vinf;
sfegatare	Vinf;
corbellare	Vinf;
vinificare	Vinf;
gratificare	Vinf;
infoltire	Vinf;
tifare	Vinf;
parafrasare	Vinf;
angariare	Vinf;
screpolare	Vinf;
cestire	Vinf;
autopromuovere	Vinf;
diliscare	Vinf;
sillogizzare	Vinf;
slattare	Vinf;
montare	Vinf;
allontanare	Vinf;
ambientare	Vinf;
arrugginire	Vinf;
debbiare	Vinf;
appassire	Vinf;
divaricare	Vinf;
rifluire	Vinf;
intervenire	Vinf;
rimboschire	Vinf;
disintegrare	Vinf;
invertire	Vinf;
danneggiare	Vinf;
predisporre	Vinf;
protestare	Vinf;
frammischiare	Vinf;
molare	Vinf;
tentacolare	Vinf;
scompaginare	Vinf;
sghignazzare	Vinf;
effondere	Vinf;
consacrare	Vinf;
negare	Vinf;
appesantire	Vinf;
spiegare	Vinf;
fervere	Vinf;
funzionare	Vinf;
delibare	Vinf;
sfarfallare	Vinf;
virare	Vinf;
delinquere	Vinf;
rateizzare	Vinf;
traccheggiare	Vinf;
desinare	Vinf;
barcamenare	Vinf;
abbicare	Vinf;
strusciare	Vinf;
riconfrontare	Vinf;
bluffare	Vinf;
rimanere	Vinf;
sfidare	Vinf;
orchestrare	Vinf;
giustificare	Vinf;
vestibolare	Vinf;
ticchettare	Vinf;
specificare	Vinf;
impinguare	Vinf;
auscultare	Vinf;
divisare	Vinf;
posare	Vinf;
sferrare	Vinf;
moderare	Vinf;
scollare	Vinf;
prediligere	Vinf;
arrotondare	Vinf;
decurtare	Vinf;
chioccolare	Vinf;
tamponare	Vinf;
sbocciare	Vinf;
prendere	Vinf;
animare	Vinf;
scaricare	Vinf;
sconsigliare	Vinf;
empiere	Vinf;
dattilografare	Vinf;
ribadire	Vinf;
bugnare	Vinf;
preparare	Vinf;
limare	Vinf;
prezzolare	Vinf;
snellire	Vinf;
tralignare	Vinf;
aumentare	Vinf;
affabulare	Vinf;
dichiarare	Vinf;
foracchiare	Vinf;
svellere	Vinf;
argomentare	Vinf;
risarcire	Vinf;
escrescere	Vinf;
abortire	Vinf;
rescindere	Vinf;
acclimatare	Vinf;
modernizzare	Vinf;
sfoderare	Vinf;
spennacchiare	Vinf;
spennare	Vinf;
chiosare	Vinf;
dialogare	Vinf;
persuadere	Vinf;
frinire	Vinf;
autenticare	Vinf;
raffigurare	Vinf;
sproloquiare	Vinf;
speronare	Vinf;
rischiare	Vinf;
sopradescrivere	Vinf;
esulare	Vinf;
separare	Vinf;
fruire	Vinf;
asserire	Vinf;
imperiare	Vinf;
istradare	Vinf;
dogmatizzare	Vinf;
diminuire	Vinf;
deburocratizzare	Vinf;
partire	Vinf;
editare	Vinf;
digitare	Vinf;
vertere	Vinf;
sfrenare	Vinf;
provocare	Vinf;
lisciviare	Vinf;
LEXICON Adv
innescare	Ainf;
battista	Ainf;
riaffezionare	Ainf;
varo	Ainf;
esoterico	Ainf;
post-comunista	Ainf;
aeroportuale	Ainf;
inestirpabile	Ainf;
dimezzare	Ainf;
smielare	Ainf;
pennellare	Ainf;
infortunato	Ainf;
inebriante	Ainf;
moralizzare	Ainf;
pirenaico	Ainf;
goloso	Ainf;
sconsacrare	Ainf;
infrarosso	Ainf;
vertebrale	Ainf;
rincrescere	Ainf;
edulcorare	Ainf;
confluire	Ainf;
luterano	Ainf;
rosso	Ainf;
manoscritto	Ainf;
anti-clinton	Ainf;
corto	Ainf;
perequativo	Ainf;
mascolinizzare	Ainf;
deragliare	Ainf;
suppletivo	Ainf;
emaciato	Ainf;
radiodiffondere	Ainf;
quindicinale	Ainf;
zompare	Ainf;
menscevico	Ainf;
quattrocentosessantesimo	Ainf;
tumultuante	Ainf;
intenzionale	Ainf;
analitico	Ainf;
interpersonale	Ainf;
ritoccare	Ainf;
cinquantottesimo	Ainf;
scomunicare	Ainf;
innamorare	Ainf;
ingolosire	Ainf;
impetuoso	Ainf;
irrompere	Ainf;
dissuadere	Ainf;
arboricolo	Ainf;
paperback	Ainf;
sopraddetto	Ainf;
lastricato	Ainf;
diesel	Ainf;
apoplettico	Ainf;
crucciare	Ainf;
firmare	Ainf;
sprecone	Ainf;
passivo	Ainf;
tondo	Ainf;
metallifero	Ainf;
jugoslavo	Ainf;
rovescio	Ainf;
carburare	Ainf;
intossicato	Ainf;
caro	Ainf;
colombiano	Ainf;
ronfare	Ainf;
inutile	Ainf;
poliziano	Ainf;
dilatativo	Ainf;
malcapitato	Ainf;
ordinato	Ainf;
tonificante	Ainf;
serrato	Ainf;
anglogiamaicano	Ainf;
scipito	Ainf;
cessare	Ainf;
lubrificante	Ainf;
miglior	Ainf;
antielusione	Ainf;
sceneggiato	Ainf;
superpatriottico	Ainf;
migratore	Ainf;
gratuito	Ainf;
cencioso	Ainf;
ricattare	Ainf;
escrescere	Ainf;
concludente	Ainf;
gattopardesco	Ainf;
rompere	Ainf;
suturare	Ainf;
carismatico	Ainf;
dubitativo	Ainf;
immenso	Ainf;
incatenare	Ainf;
rilasciare	Ainf;
conciliativo	Ainf;
cresimare	Ainf;
pettinato	Ainf;
esultare	Ainf;
maliardo	Ainf;
antimeridionale	Ainf;
filantropico	Ainf;
uditorio	Ainf;
armamentare	Ainf;
pettinare	Ainf;
clownesco	Ainf;
incavato	Ainf;
bere	Ainf;
demoniaco	Ainf;
riservato	Ainf;
tradurre	Ainf;
concorrere	Ainf;
grattare	Ainf;
infettivo	Ainf;
assumere	Ainf;
cordiale	Ainf;
strabiliante	Ainf;
ricrescere	Ainf;
informatore	Ainf;
circasso	Ainf;
simbolizzare	Ainf;
residuo	Ainf;
infimo	Ainf;
provare	Ainf;
conguagliare	Ainf;
funicolare	Ainf;
anti-nucleare	Ainf;
chimerico	Ainf;
uncinato	Ainf;
impalpabile	Ainf;
scolpire	Ainf;
frinire	Ainf;
pudibondo	Ainf;
localizzare	Ainf;
baleniero	Ainf;
spruzzare	Ainf;
desnudo	Ainf;
profanare	Ainf;
pensile	Ainf;
assicurato	Ainf;
nuovayorchese	Ainf;
sorbire	Ainf;
calettare	Ainf;
bioetico	Ainf;
zodiacale	Ainf;
ritrasmettere	Ainf;
astrologare	Ainf;
antitelevisivo	Ainf;
nevischiare	Ainf;
detronizzare	Ainf;
avvelenare	Ainf;
trentaseiesimo	Ainf;
anti-elusione	Ainf;
autocostituire	Ainf;
inflazionistico	Ainf;
autosospendere	Ainf;
quattrocentodecimo	Ainf;
trasfusionale	Ainf;
sudamericano	Ainf;
